New Jersey, session 222, A3455.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-22) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  A law enforcement officer, member of a domestic crisis team, physician or other medical professional, victim counselor, guidance counselor, mental health professional,  or any other person having reasonable cause to believe that a person is or has been a victim of domestic violence shall report the same immediately to the local law enforcement agency.  Such reports, where possible, shall contain the name and address of the victim, the nature and possible extent of the injuries, if known, and any other information that the person believes may be relevant with respect to the domestic violence and the identity of the perpetrator. b.    A law enforcement officer [or a], member of a domestic crisis team, physician or other medical professional, victim counselor, guidance counselor, mental health professional,  or any other person who, in good faith, reports a possible incident of domestic violence to the [police] local law enforcement agency shall not be held liable in any civil or criminal action brought by any party for an arrest based on probable cause, enforcement in good faith of a court order, any action or proceeding in any court of this State, including municipal court, or any other act or omission in good faith under this act. c.    Whenever such person is required to report under this section in his capacity as a member of the staff of a medical or other public or private institution, facility or agency, he shall immediately notify the person in charge of such institution, facility or agency, or his designated agent, who then also shall become responsible to report or cause the report to be made.  However, nothing in this section is intended to require more than one report from any such institution or agency. d.    The law enforcement agency which takes a domestic violence incident report pursuant to this section shall forward the information to the Commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs and the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to be entered in the domestic violence registry established pursuant to P.L.1999, c. 421 (C.2C:25-34). (cf: P.L.1994, c.94, s.2) 2.    (New section) Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of section 6 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-22) by failing to report an act of domestic violence while having reasonable cause to believe that a person is or has been a victim of domestic violence  shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day following enactment.